Illinois, session 104th, SB1316.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    (5 ILCS 805/Act rep.)5    Section 5. The Illinois TRUST Act is repealed. 6    Section 10. The Illinois Identification Card Act is 7amended by changing Section 11 as follows: 8    (15 ILCS 335/11)  (from Ch. 124, par. 31)9    Sec. 11. Records. 10    (a) The Secretary may make a search of his records and 11furnish information as to whether a person has a current 12Standard Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois Person 13with a Disability Identification Card then on file, upon 14receipt of a written application therefor accompanied with the 15prescribed fee. However, the Secretary may not disclose 16medical information concerning an individual to any person, 17public agency, private agency, corporation or governmental 18body unless the individual has submitted a written request for 19the information or unless the individual has given prior 20written consent for the release of the information to a 21specific person or entity. This exception shall not apply to: 22(1) offices and employees of the Secretary who have a need to   SB1316- 2 -LRB104 03911 RLC 13935 b1know the medical information in performance of their official 2duties, or (2) orders of a court of competent jurisdiction. 3When medical information is disclosed by the Secretary in 4accordance with the provisions of this Section, no liability 5shall rest with the Office of the Secretary of State as the 6information is released for informational purposes only.7    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 8Secretary may release personally identifying information only 9to:10        (1) officers and employees of the Secretary who have a 11    need to know that information for issuance of driver's 12    licenses, permits, or identification cards and 13    investigation of fraud or misconduct;14        (2) other governmental agencies for use in their 15    official governmental functions;16        (3) law enforcement agencies for a criminal or civil 17    investigation, except as restricted by subsections (g) and 18    (h);19        (3-5) the State Board of Elections as may be required 20    by an agreement the State Board of Elections has entered 21    into with a multi-state voter registration list 22    maintenance system; or23        (4) any entity that the Secretary has authorized, by 24    rule.25    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 26Secretary may release highly restricted personal information   SB1316- 3 -LRB104 03911 RLC 13935 b1only to:2        (1) officers and employees of the Secretary who have a 3    need to access the information for the issuance of 4    driver's licenses, permits, or identification cards and 5    investigation of fraud or misconduct;6        (2) law enforcement officials for a criminal or civil 7    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 8    subsections (g) and (h);9        (3) the State Board of Elections for the purpose of 10    providing the signature for completion of voter 11    registration; or12        (4) any other entity the Secretary has authorized by 13    rule.14    (d) Documents required to be submitted with an application 15for an identification card to prove the applicant's identity 16(name and date of birth), social security number or lack of a 17social security number, written signature, residency, and, as 18applicable, citizenship and immigration status and country of 19citizenship shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed 20except to the following persons:21        (1) the individual to whom the identification card was 22    issued, upon written request;23        (2) officers and employees of the Secretary of State 24    who have a need to have access to the stored images for 25    purposes of issuing and controlling driver's licenses, 26    permits, or identification cards and investigation of   SB1316- 4 -LRB104 03911 RLC 13935 b1    fraud or misconduct;2        (3) law enforcement officials for a civil or criminal 3    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 4    subsections (g) and (h);5        (4) other entities that the Secretary may authorize by 6    rule.7    (e) The Secretary may not disclose an individual's social 8security number or any associated information obtained from 9the Social Security Administration without the written request 10or consent of the individual except: (i) to officers and 11employees of the Secretary who have a need to know the social 12security number in the performance of their official duties; 13(ii) except as restricted by subsections (g) and (h) to law 14enforcement officials for a civil or criminal law enforcement 15investigation if an officer of the law enforcement agency has 16made a written request to the Secretary specifying the law 17enforcement investigation for which the social security number 18is being sought; (iii) under a lawful court order signed by a 19judge; (iv) to the Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs 20for the purpose of confirming veteran status to agencies in 21other states responsible for the issuance of state 22identification cards for participation in State-to-State 23verification service; or (v) the last 4 digits to the Illinois 24State Board of Elections for purposes of voter registration 25and as may be required pursuant to an agreement for a 26multi-state voter registration list maintenance system. The   SB1316- 5 -LRB104 03911 RLC 13935 b1Secretary retains the right to require additional verification 2regarding the validity of a request from law enforcement. If 3social security information is disclosed by the Secretary in 4accordance with this Section, no liability shall rest with the 5Office of the Secretary of State or any of its officers or 6employees, as the information is released for official 7purposes only. 8    (f) The Secretary of State shall not provide facial 9recognition search services or photographs obtained in the 10process of issuing an identification card to any federal, 11State, or local law enforcement agency or other governmental 12entity for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration laws. 13This subsection shall not apply to requests from federal, 14State, or local law enforcement agencies or other governmental 15entities for facial recognition search services or photographs 16obtained in the process of issuing a driver's license or 17permit when the purpose of the request relates to criminal 18activity other than violations of immigration laws. 19    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 20Secretary may not release highly restricted personal 21information or personally identifying information or disclose 22documents described in subsection (d) to any immigration 23agent, as defined in Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act, 24unless necessary to comply with the following, to the extent 25that production of such information or documents is 26specifically required:  SB1316- 6 -LRB104 03911 RLC 13935 b1        (1) a lawful court order;2        (2) a judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed 3    pursuant to Article III of the Constitution of the United 4    States; or5        (3) a subpoena for individual records issued by a 6    federal or State court.7    When responding to such a court order, warrant, or 8subpoena, the Secretary shall disclose only those documents or 9information specifically requested. Within 3 business days of 10receiving such a court order, warrant, or subpoena, the 11Secretary shall send a notification to the individual about 12whom such information was requested that a court order, 13warrant, or subpoena was received and the identity of the 14entity that presented the court order, warrant, or subpoena.15    As used in this subsection, "immigration agent" means an 16agent of federal Immigration and Customs Enforcement, federal 17Customs and Border Protection, or any similar or successor 18agency. 19    (h) The Secretary shall not enter into or maintain any 20agreement regarding the sharing of any highly restricted 21personal information or personally identifying information or 22documents described in subsection (d) unless all other parties 23to such agreement certify that the information obtained will 24not be used for civil immigration purposes or knowingly 25disseminated to any third party for any purpose related to 26civil immigration enforcement.   SB1316- 7 -LRB104 03911 RLC 13935 b1(Source: P.A. 102-354, eff. 8-13-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 2    Section 15. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 3changing Section 6-110.3 as follows: 4    (625 ILCS 5/6-110.3)5    Sec. 6-110.3. Restrictions on use of information for 6certain purposes.7    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 8Secretary may not release or make accessible in any manner any 9highly restricted personal information as defined in Section 101-125.9 or personally identifying information as defined in 11Section 1-159.2, provide images, photos, or facial recognition 12services as described in Section 6-110.1, or disclose 13documents as described in Section 6-110.2 to any immigration 14agent as defined in Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act, 15unless necessary to comply with the following, to the extent 16that production of such information or documents is 17specifically required:18        (1) a lawful court order;19        (2) a judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed 20    pursuant to Article III of the Constitution of the United 21    States; or22        (3) a subpoena for individual records issued by a 23    federal or State court.24    When responding to such a court order, warrant, or   SB1316- 8 -LRB104 03911 RLC 13935 b1subpoena, the Secretary shall disclose only those documents or 2information specifically requested. Within 3 business days of 3receiving such a court order, warrant, or subpoena, the 4Secretary shall send a notification to the individual about 5whom such information was requested that a court order, 6warrant, or subpoena was received and the identity of the 7entity that presented the court order, warrant, or subpoena.8    As used in this subsection, "immigration agent" means an 9agent of federal Immigration and Customs Enforcement, federal 10Customs and Border Protection, or any similar or successor 11agency. 12    (b) The Secretary shall not enter into or maintain any 13agreement regarding the sharing of any highly restricted 14personal information as defined in Section 1-125.9, personally 15identifying information as defined in Section 1-159.2, images 16or photos described in Section 6-110.1, or documents described 17in Section 6-110.2 unless all other parties to such agreement 18certify that the information obtained will not be used for 19civil immigration purposes or knowingly disseminated to any 20third party for any purpose related to civil immigration 21enforcement. 22(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.